Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,103
Long-term acute care hospitals; coverage; state plan amendment or waiver.

No later than July 1, 2023, the department shall submit a state plan amendment or waiver to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to provide coverage under the medical assistance program for long-term acute care hospitals.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 59.